Tables/Contraction/de-kurzschrift-wort.cti
# Doppelvokale
always erdbeer 12456-145-12-15-15-1235
always waldbeer 2456-25-145-12-15-15-1235
always zwergerdbeer 1356-2456-12456-1245-12456-145-12-15-15-1235
always frisbee 124-1235-24-234-12-15-15
always kaffee =
always coffee 6-14-135-124-124-15-15
always toffee 2345-135-124-124-15-15
always dragee =
always bungee 12-256-1245-15-15
always dorothee 145-26-135-2345-125-15-15
always cheese 1456-15-15-234-15
always pappmaschee 1234-1-1234-1234-134-1-156-15-15
always klischee 13-123-24-156-15-15
always yankee 6-13456-235-13-15-15
sufword teenie 2345-15-15-1345-346
sufword teenager 2345-15-15-1345-1-1245-12456
always gelee 1245-13456-15-15
prfword geleerte 12346-123-15-15-1235-236
always geleert 12346-123-15-15-1235-2345

always soufflee =
always defilee 145-15-124-24-123-15-15
always klee =
begword tee =
always renommee 1235-14-135-1346-15-15
always armee 356-134-15-15
always resümee 1235-123456-1256-134-15-15
always schnee 156-1345-15-15
always trainee 2345-1235-1-24-1345-15-15
always pralinee 1234-1235-1-123-35-15-15
always portmonee 1234-26-2345-134-135-1345-15-15
always kanapee 13-235-1-1234-15-15
always portepee 1234-26-236-1234-15-15
always separee 234-15-1234-356-15-15
always referee 1235-15-124-12456-15-15
always schikoree 156-24-13-26-15-15
always spree 234-1234-1235-15-15
always karree 13-356-1235-15-15
always porree 1234-26-1235-15-15
always püree 1234-1256-1235-15-15
always frikassee 124-1235-24-13-1-2346-15-15
always plissee 1234-123-24-2346-15-15
always varietee 1236-356-24-15-2345-15-15
always komitee =
always trustee 2345-1235-136-23456-15-15
always frottee 124-1235-135-2345-2345-15-15
always queen =
always halloween 125-1-12345-135-2456-15-15-1345

always hawaii =
always ascii =

always boom =
always voodoo =
always yahoo =
always waterloo 2456-1-2345-12456-123-135-135
always shampoo =
always tattoo =
always daewoo =
always zoo =
